Utah statutes.
16-10a-1606.   Information respecting shares.

Upon the written request of any shareholder, a corporation at its own expense shall mail to him the information specified by Subsection 16-10a-625(3), whether or not the information is also contained or summarized on any share certificate of the shareholder.  The corporation may comply with this section by mailing articles of incorporation including the designations, preferences, limitations, and relative rights applicable to each class and series of shares and the authority of the board of directors to determine variations for any existing or future class or series. 

